New Jersey, session 221, S3688.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  There is created in, but not of, the Department of the Treasury, the Office of the State Chief Efficiency Officer.  The State Chief Efficiency Officer shall be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate and shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor during the Governors term of office.  The person serving as State Chief Efficiency Officer shall be an employee of the office and shall carry out the duties of the office on a full-time basis.  Any vacancy occurring in the position shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment.  If the officer shall be unable for any reason to serve the full term of office, the Governor may designate an acting State Chief Efficiency Officer until a successor is appointed and qualified. b.  The State Chief Efficiency Officer shall: (1)  establish rules and regulations, in consultation with the department, concerning the operation, management, and oversight of the office; (2)  hire and maintain staff to assist in carrying out the responsibilities of the office; (3)  ensure that taxpayer funds are spent efficiently and responsibly across the State government, including, but not limited to, office supplies, electricity and other utility usage, tracking performance, and assessing budgets and operation systems; (4)  identify cost savings in State government; (5)  work with the Efficiency Officer of each State department, county, and municipality, established pursuant to section 2 of P.L.,c.   (C.   )(pending before the Legislature as this bill), as needed and deemed appropriate; (6)  issue an annual report to the Legislature, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), detailing the cost savings secured for the State the previous year, and the cost savings secured by each State department, county and municipal Efficiency Officer; and (7)  establish and maintain a webpage on the department website, which shall include the annual report, and the annual reports of each Executive Branch, county, and municipal Efficiency Officer. 2.  Each Executive Branch department shall have an Efficiency Officer.  Each county and municipality in the State may establish the position of Efficiency Officer.  The Efficiency Officer shall: (1)  ensure that department, county, or municipal funds, as appropriate, are spent efficiently and responsibly including, but not limited to, office supplies, electricity and other utility usage, tracking performance, and assessing the budget and operation systems; (2)  identify cost savings in the department, county, or municipality, as appropriate; and (3)  issue an annual report to the State Chief Efficiency Officer established pursuant to section 1 of P.L. , c.   (C.   )(pending before the Legislature as this bill) detailing the cost savings secured for the department the previous year. 3.  This act shall take effect immediately.